Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2
BRAND INSPECTION

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added with relocations in 2009 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in article 11 of title 12. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this part 2, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For custom processing of meat animals, see article 33 of this title 35.

35-43-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the state board of stock inspection commissioners, created in section 35-41-101.

"Department" means the Colorado department of agriculture, created in section 24-1-123, C.R.S.

"Livestock" means all cattle, calves, horses, mules, and donkeys.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 342, § 2, effective July 1.

35-43-202. Brand inspections - custom processing houses - packing plants - feedlots - acceptable forms of evidence - rules.

The board may, during regular business hours, inspect the records, brands, bills of sale, hides, horns, and other items related to proving ownership of or ascertaining the identity of slaughtered livestock at any custom processing house or packing plant licensed by the department or by the United States department of agriculture.

Pursuant to its authority under section 35-41-101 (3), the board may adopt rules in furtherance of this part 2, including rules governing record keeping, contact information, the contents of bills of sale and other records of transfers of livestock or carcasses, the mixing of inspected and uninspected livestock, hide retention, hide exhibition, and brand inspection.

No person shall slaughter any livestock purchased in Colorado that have not been inspected for brands by an authorized Colorado brand inspector immediately prior to slaughter.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 343, § 2, effective July 1.

35-43-203. Requirements for slaughterer business.

Every person carrying on the trade or business of a slaughterer of livestock in this state:

Shall maintain an established place of business;

Shall not slaughter livestock on the open range;

Shall require from all sellers of livestock a bill of sale that gives a complete description of each animal so sold and purchased including marks, brands, age, weight, name of person from whom it was purchased or otherwise acquired, date, and place of purchase or acquisition;

Shall keep a true record of all livestock purchased or slaughtered, and of any carcass or part of a carcass purchased, in one or more special books kept for such purposes. Such records shall include a complete description of each such animal or carcass, including the approximate age and weight, breed and color, fire brands, earmarks, and any other identifying characteristics and the date of purchase and from whom such animal, carcass, or part of carcass was purchased.

Shall keep the hide and horns of each animal slaughtered for inspection for a period of thirty days after it is slaughtered except when written permission for sale or destruction of the same is given by a regular or special brand inspector prior to expiration of said period. A certified copy of the bill of sale shall accompany the hide when it is offered for sale.

Shall require any person from whom he or she purchases the carcass or any part thereof, not inspected by a state brand inspector immediately prior to slaughter, to exhibit the hide as provided in section 35-43-207;

Shall not receive any carcass or part of a carcass for storage unless each hide has been inspected and all meat stamped, if required, by the brand commissioner. This paragraph (g) shall not apply to any person who slaughters livestock that are officially inspected by the state brand inspector immediately prior to slaughter.

Shall not mix any cattle that are uninspected for brands by an authorized Colorado brand inspector with any livestock that have been inspected by a Colorado brand inspector just prior to slaughter.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 343, § 2, effective July 1.

35-43-204. Investigations.

The board may investigate possible violations of this part 2 on the basis of a complaint or when the board has other reasonable grounds to believe that any person has violated any such provision.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 344, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-101 (4) as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-205. Exemption - limitation.

Every person carrying on the trade or business of a slaughterer of livestock in this state who is exempt from section 35-43-203 (1)(g) shall not slaughter any livestock purchased in Colorado that have not been inspected for brands by an authorized Colorado brand inspector immediately prior to slaughter.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 344, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-101 (5) as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-206. Records - hides - open to public view.

The record provided for in section 35-43-203 (1)(d) and also the hide shall be open to the inspection of all persons for a period of thirty days, and it is unlawful for any slaughterer to refuse to permit such inspection or examination.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 344, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-103 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-207. Sales by persons other than slaughterers - requirements.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale or to possess, except as specifically provided in this article or in article 33 of this title, a carcass of livestock or any portion of such carcass without first exhibiting the hide intact and exposing the brand upon the hide, if any, to the purchaser. It is the duty of any such person selling or offering for sale any such carcass of livestock to preserve the hide of the same for a period of thirty days, unless the hide from such a carcass of livestock has been previously inspected and released by a duly authorized Colorado brand inspector, and to exhibit the same for inspection upon demand of any person.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 344, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-104 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-208. Person killing for own use.

Unless the hide has been previously inspected and released by a duly authorized Colorado brand inspector, it is unlawful for any person to possess or to kill livestock to obtain any part of the animal for his or her own use without preserving the hide of such animal intact with a complete unskinned tail attached thereto for a period of not less than thirty days, during which period the hide shall be presented upon the demand of any person.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 344, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-105 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-209. When hides admitted as evidence.

If a hide is subsequently produced by or on behalf of a person who has butchered any livestock alleged to have been stolen and is claimed to be the hide of the animal killed, the hide shall be exhibited as soon as possible for inspection to the sheriff of the county in which the animal was butchered. No such hide shall be admitted in evidence nor shall evidence to identify such hide with the animal alleged to be stolen be received until the prosecution is given such reasonable opportunity as may be fixed by court to examine the hide and compare it with the meat.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 345, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-108 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-210. Inspection of hide.

The sheriff or deputy sheriff of any county in this state and any regular or special brand inspector appointed by the board are hereby authorized and empowered to require any person who kills for his or her own use and consumption any livestock to produce for inspection the hide of any such livestock that has been killed within thirty days unless the livestock has been inspected and tagged prior to such demand for inspection. In the absence of the owner or proper corporate officer, the person in charge of the premises where the meat then is shall produce the hide for inspection upon demand.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 345, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-106 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-211. Grounds for search warrant.

If a person who, within thirty days, has killed any livestock or, in that person's absence, the person in charge of the premises where the livestock was killed fails or refuses to produce the hide of the livestock, any sheriff, deputy, or regular brand inspector may seize and take possession of the meat of such livestock and hold the meat until the hide is produced and, before or after the seizure of the meat, may seek a search warrant for the theft of livestock and the meat thereof as the property of an unknown owner. The failure to produce such hide upon demand shall be sufficient grounds upon which to base the affidavit for the search warrant, and the procedure on complaint for a search warrant shall be as provided in part 3 of article 3 of title 16, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 345, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-107 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-212. Violations - penalties.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, any person violating this part 2 commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, any person that violates this part 2 within three years after a previous violation of this part 2 by that same person commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

A person who unlawfully butchers an animal belonging to another person commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 345, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3282, § 642, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-109 as it existed prior to 2009.

35-43-213. Brand inspection - certificate - evidence.

Any livestock purchased for slaughter in Colorado from any source shall be inspected for brands and other identifying marks and a certificate issued by a brand inspector at the point of origin. Until the time of such inspection and certification, the person purchasing livestock shall hold the uninspected livestock separately and shall be responsible for the value of the livestock and the brand inspection fee until inspected and a certificate issued by a Colorado brand inspector.

The only evidence of inspection at point of origin acceptable under this section shall be either the brand certificate issued and signed by the brand inspector who made the inspection or a current account of sale, showing the brands or other identifying characteristics carried by the livestock and issued by a custom meat processor licensed by the department or a packing plant licensed by the United States department of agriculture. Livestock purchased by private contract in states where brand inspection is not maintained shall be accompanied by a bill of sale showing brands and other identifying characteristics signed by the seller or the seller's agent and witnessed by the buyer or the buyer's agent.

Cattle fed by packers, either in their individual feed lots or in commercial feed lots, are subject to this article.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 346, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-11-111 as it existed prior to 2009.